Utah statutes.
72-10-403.   Airport zoning regulations -- Joint airport zoning board -- Powers of board -- Membership.

(1) (a) In order to prevent the creation or establishment of airport hazards, every political subdivision having an airport hazard area within its territorial limits may adopt, administer, and enforce, under the police power and in the manner and upon the conditions prescribed in this part, airport zoning regulations for the airport hazard area.

(b)  The regulations may divide the area into zones, and, within the zones, specify the land uses permitted and regulate and restrict the height to which structures and trees may be erected or allowed to grow.

(2) (a)  If an airport is owned or controlled by a political subdivision and any airport hazard area appertaining to the airport is located outside the territorial limits of the political subdivision, the political subdivision owning or controlling the airport and the political subdivision within which the airport hazard area is located may, by ordinance or resolution duly adopted, create a joint airport zoning board.

(b)  The board shall have the same power to adopt, administer, and enforce airport zoning regulations applicable to the airport hazard area in question as that vested by Subsection (1) in the political subdivision within which the area is located.

(c)  Each joint board shall have as members two representatives appointed by each political subdivision participating in its creation and in addition a chair elected by a majority of the appointed members.

